Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2943.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; DAKOTA COUNTY MENTAL HEALTH CRISIS SERVICES.new text end new text begin $3,400,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for a grant to Dakota County for mental health crisis services, including mobile crisis response, crisis follow-up and stabilization services, and embedded social workers with local public safety agencies. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end